Hawaii, session 2026, GM1336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that department of
education employees and state public charter school employees
play an important role in shaping the future and ensuring the
welfare of the State's children. Increasing safeguards for
educational workers who may encounter instances of harassment
because of their status as an educational worker, and the
establishment of a mechanism to address this harassment is
essential to ensuring a secure and conducive environment for
educators and students in the State.
The purpose of this part is to provide increased protection
for educational workers by:
(1) Requiring the department of education and state public
charter schools to take certain steps to better
address the harassment of educational workers,
including sports officials; and
2026-3458 HB1888 GDI HMSO
iniiiininMiiiiinw^

Page 2 H.B. NO.
hTs
C.D. 1
(2) Authorizing the attorney general to assist educational
workers, including sports officials at department of
education or public charter school sporting events,
who have been subject to harassment or intentional
bodily injury in obtaining a temporary restraining
order.
SECTION 2. Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§302A- Educational workers; protection and workplace
safety; harassment; reporting; training. (a) When any
educational worker believes that the educational worker is being
subjected to harassment, as provided for in section 711-1106, by
a person not employed by the department because of the
educational worker's position as an educational worker, the
educational worker may inform the educational worker's immediate
supervisor, who shall take appropriate action using the
procedures established pursuant to subsection (c)(3), including
but not limited to change of workstation, development of a
safety plan, mediation, administrative leave, or other actions
in alignment with collective bargaining agreements.
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO
iiiiiiiMiiininiiiiiiwiiliii

Page 3 H.B. NO.
^^0^3
C.D. 1
(b) An educational worker who seeks judicial protection
from harassment, as provided for in section 711-1106, by a
person not employed by the department because of the educational
worker's position as an educational worker, including obtaining
a temporary restraining order, shall be entitled to a leave of
absence with pay to attend court proceedings related to the
protection; provided that the educational worker shall provide
documentation to the department verifying the court-related
leave of absence; provided further that for those employees
included in bargaining units pursuant to section 89-6, the leave
of absence shall be negotiated pursuant to section 89-9(a). The
duration of the leave of absence with pay shall be reasonable
and sufficient to allow the educational worker to fulfill their
court-related obligations.
(c) The department shall:
(1) Conduct a formal internal investigation of all
incidents of harassment submitted to the department by
an educational worker pursuant to subsection (a);
provided that for the purposes of this paragraph,
"formal internal investigation" does not include an
investigation conducted by a contracted third party;
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO
MniiiiiiunniniiH

Page 4 1888
H.B. NO.
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
Report to the proper law enforcement authority within
forty-eight hours all incidents of harassment
submitted to the department by an educational worker
pursuant to subsection (a), where the incident of
harassment involves a potential threat of physical
harm to the educational worker or another person;
(3) Implement procedures for the handling of harassment of
educational workers, including educational workers
excluded from collective bargaining under chapter 89;
provided that:
(A) The procedures shall be included with current
information related to harassment and safety in
the department's opening of the school year
packet that is provided to all department
employees annually; and
(B) The procedures shall be posted on the
department's website with current information
regarding procedures for employee safety;
(4) Develop a written emergency safety plan for aiding
educational workers who may experience potentially
harmful situations, including situations involving
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO 4
iiiMiniiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 5 H.B. NO.
hTs
C.D. 1
harassment^ occurring in their work areas; provided
that the department shall give consideration to
suggestions provided by educational workers in
developing the emergency safety plan; provided further
that plans shall include procedures developed pursuant
to paragraph (3) and subsection (a);
(5) Assist educational workers with legal actions to
obtain temporary restraining orders that may arise
from harassment, as provided for in section 711-1106,
by a person not employed by the department because of
the educational worker's position as an educational
worker, including reimbursing the educational worker
for the costs incurred from serving temporary
restraining orders related to the harassment; provided
that reimbursement shall not include the payment of
attorneys' fees or court costs; and
(6) Ensure implementation of annual training for all
educational workers on how to handle harassment
situations and the use of de-escalation techniques;
provided that this training shall be included in the
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO
MiiiiiHiiniioiiiiiiiin

Page 6 H.B. NO. £3
C.D. 1
annual safety training provided by the department for
all employees.
(d) The attorney general may assist educational workers
who are subjected to harassment or intentional bodily injury in
obtaining a temporary restraining order.
(e) The authorization for the department of the attorney
general to assist educational workers in obtaining a temporary
restraining order under this section shall be discretionary.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to;
(1) Authorize the department of the attorney general to
provide representation to an educational worker in
obtaining a temporary restraining order or to petition
for relief on behalf of an educational worker; or
(2) Authorize a grievance or private right of action,
whether in law or in equity, against the State,
department of the attorney general, or any officer or
employee of the department of the attorney general,
whether in an official or individual capacity,
relating to or arising out of subsection (d), and no
court or tribunal shall have subject matter
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO


Page 7
H■ I .. B. NO.
g 2
C.D. 1
jjjrisdlctJ^on t^considex ariy cla irns^^]^a;tjjT^to U}^
same.
(f) For the purposes of this section:
"Educational worker" means any administrator, specialist,
counselor, teacher, sports official, or employee of the
department or a person hired by the department on a contractual
basis and engaged in carrying out a department function.
"Sports official" means a person at a sports event at a
public school who enforces the rules of the event, such as an
umpire, referee, timer, or scorer, or a person who supervises
the participants, such as a coach, or a league or school
administrator, regardless of whether the person is paid or
provides their services as an unpaid volunteer."
SECTION 3. Chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§302D- Educational workers; protection and workplace
safety; harassment; reporting; training. (a) When any
educational worker believes that the educational worker is being
subjected to harassment, as provided for in section 711-1106, by
a person not employed by a public charter school because of the
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO
■iininiiRiiiHHniiiii

Page 8 H.B. NO 1888
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
educational worker's position as an educational worker, the
educational worker may inform the educational worker's immediate
supervisor, who shall take appropriate action using the
procedures established pursuant to subsection (c)(3), including
but not limited to change of workstation, development of a
safety plan, mediation, administrative leave, or other actions
in alignment with collective bargaining agreements.
(b) An educational worker who seeks judicial protection
from harassment, as provided for in section 711-1106, by a
person not employed by a public charter school because of the
educational worker's position as an educational worker,
including obtaining a temporary restraining order, shall be
entitled to a leave of absence with pay to attend court
proceedings related to the protection; provided that the
educational worker shall provide documentation to the public
charter school verifying the court-related leave of absence;
provided further that for those employees included in bargaining
units pursuant to section 89-6, the leave of absence shall be
negotiated pursuant to section 89-9(a). The duration of the
leave of absence with pay shall be reasonable and sufficient to
allow the educational worker to fulfill their court-related
2026-3458 HB1888 GDI HMSO 8
lllill■llnlllinllllllDllll

Page 9 1888
H.B. NO.
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
obligations.
(c) A public charter school shall:
(1) Conduct a formal internal investigation of all
incidents of harassment submitted to the public
charter school by an educational worker pursuant to
subsection (a); provided that for the purposes of this
paragraph, "formal internal investigation" does not
include an investigation conducted by a contracted
third party;
(2) Report to the proper law enforcement authority within
forty-eight hours all incidents of harassment
submitted to the public charter school by an
educational worker pursuant to subsection (a), where
the incident of harassment involves a potential threat
of physical harm to the educational worker or another
person;
(3) Implement procedures for the handling of harassment of
educational workers, including educational workers
excluded from collective bargaining under chapter 89;
provided that:
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO

■■iiiinHiiiiiinMiiii

Page 10 H.B. NO.
hTs
C.D. 1
(A) The procedures shall be provided to all employees
of a public charter school annually; and
(B) The procedures shall be posted on the public
charter school's website;
(4) Develop a written emergency safety plan for aiding
educational workers who may experience potentially
harmful situations^ including situations involving
harassment^ occurring in their work areas; provided
that the public charter school shall give
consideration to suggestions provided by educational
workers in developing the emergency safety plan;
provided further that plans shall include procedures
developed pursuant to paragraph (3) and
subsection (a);
(5) Assist educational workers with legal actions to
obtain temporary restraining orders that may arise
from harassment, as provided for in section 711-1106,
by a person not employed by a public charter school
because of the educational worker's position as an
educational worker, including reimbursing the
educational worker for the costs incurred from serving
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO 1

Page 11 H.B. NO.
hTs
C.D. 1
temporary restraining orders related to the
harassment; provided that reimbursement shall not
include the payment of attorneys* fees or court costs;
ar^
(6) Ensure implementation of annual training for all
educational workers on how to handle harassment
situations and the use of de-escalation technigues.
(d) The attorney general may assist educational workers
who are subjected to harassment or intentional bodily injury in
obtaining a temporary restraining order.
(e) The authorization for the department of the attorney
general to assist educational workers in obtaining a temporary
restraining order under this section shall be discretionary.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Authorize the department of the attorney general to
provide representation to an educational worker in
obtaining a temporary restraining order or to petition
for relief on behalf of an educational worker; or
(2) Authorize a grievance or private right of action^
whether in law or in equity, against the State,
department of the attorney general, or any officer or
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO 11
■lllillllilllllllillM

Page 12 H■ .. B.. N'I O.
hTs
g Q 2
C.D. 1
employee of the department of the attorney general,
whether in an official or individual capacity,
relating to or arising out of subsection (d), and no
court or tribunal shall have subject matter
jurisdiction to consider any claims relating to the
sam^
(f) For the purposes of this section:
"Educational worker" means any administrator, specialist,
counselor, teacher, sports official, or employee of a public
charter school or a person hired by a public charter school on a
contractual basis and engaged in carrying out a public charter
school function.
"Sports official" means a person at a sports event at a
public charter school who enforces the rules of the event, such
as an umpire, referee, timer, or scorer, or a person who
supervises the participants, such as a coach, or a league or
school administrator, regardless of whether the person is paid
or provides their services as an unpaid volunteer."
PART II'
SECTION 4. Section 711-1106, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO

iniiiiiiiiinminiH

Page 13
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"§711-1106 Harassment. (1) A person commits the offense
of harassment if, with intent to harass, annoy, or alarm any
other person, that person:
(a) Strikes, shoves, kicks, or otherwise touches another
person in an offensive manner or subjects the other
person to offensive physical contact;
(b) Insults, taunts, or challenges another person in a
manner likely to provoke an immediate violent response
or that would cause the other person to reasonably
believe that the actor intends to cause bodily injury
to the recipient or another or damage to the property
of the recipient or another;
(c) Repeatedly makes telephone calls, facsimile
transmissions, or any form of electronic communication
as defined in section 711-1111(2), including
electronic mail transmissions, without purpose of
legitimate communication;
(d) Repeatedly makes a communication anonymously or at an
extremely inconvenient hour;
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO 13
lllliilllllllllllliMlllll

Page 14 1888
H.B. NO.
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(e) Repeatedly makes communications, after being advised
by the person to whom the communication is directed
that further communication is unwelcome; [e^]
(f) Makes a communication using offensively coarse
language that would cause the recipient to reasonably
believe that the actor intends to cause bodily injury
to the recipient or another or damage to the property
of the recipient or another[—]; or
(g) Disrupts or interferes with the administration or
functions of any school, school administration office,
or school board.
(2) [Harasomcnt] Except as provided in subsection (3),
harassment is a petty misdemeanor.
(3) Harassment is a misdemeanor if committed against an
educational worker who is engaged in the performance of duty or
who is within an educational facility.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "educational worker"
means any administrator, specialist, counselor, teacher, or
employee of the department of education or a public charter
school; a person who is a volunteer as defined in section 90-1,
in a school program, activity, or function that is established.
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO 14

Page 15 1888
H.B. NO.
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
sanctioned^ or approved by the department of education or a
public charter school; or a sports official or other person
hired by the department of education or a public charter school
on a contractual basis and engaged in carrying out a department
of education or public charter school function."
PART III
SECTION 5. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3458 HB1888 CDl HMSO 15
iiwnniiiiiHiMiiiii

H.B. NO.
hTs
C.D. 1
APPROVED this I3th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1888, HD 3, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1888, H.D. 3, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
150-26